District of Columbia statutes.
47-391.04

Exemption from liability for claims for authority employees.

The Authority, its members, and its employees may not be liable for any obligation of or claim against the Authority or its members or employees or the District of Columbia resulting from actions taken to carry out this Act.

History

Apr. 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 105, Pub. L. 104-8, § 104
Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 224, Pub. L. 104-134, § 153(c)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-391.4.

References in Text

“This Act,” referred to in this section, is the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Act of 1995, approved April 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 97, Pub. L. 104-8.